Missouri, session 2026, SB1149.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Chapter 334, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
2 one new section, to be known as section 334.730, to read as
3 follows:
1 334.730. SECTION 1. TITLE AND PURPOSE
2 This statute shall be known and cited as the Athletic
3 Trainer Compact. The purposes of this compact are to expand
4 mobility of Athletic Training practice and improve public
5 access to services by providing qualified Licensed Athletic
6 Trainers the ability to practice in other Member States.
7 This compact preserves the regulatory authority of States to
8 protect public health and safety through the current system
9 of State licensure.
10 This compact is designed to achieve the following
11 objectives:
12 A. Increase public access to Athletic Training and
13 enhance continuity of care by providing for the mutual
14 recognition of other Licenses issued by Member States;
15 B. Provide an additional streamlined opportunity for
16 interstate practice by Licensed Athletic Trainers who meet
17 compact uniform requirements;

SB 1149 2
18 C. Promote mobility and workforce development by
19 eliminating the necessity for Licenses in multiple States by
20 providing for the mutual recognition of other Licenses
21 issued by Member States;
22 D. Reduce administrative burdens on Licensed Athletic
23 Trainers and Member States;
24 E. Enhance the States' ability to protect the public's
25 health and safety;
26 F. Encourage the cooperation of Member States in
27 regulating interstate practice of Licensed Athletic Trainers;
28 G. Support relocating Active Military Members and
29 their spouses;
30 H. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative,
31 and disciplinary information among Member States;
32 I. Allow for the use of telehealth to facilitate
33 increased access to Athletic Training services;
34 J. Support the uniformity of Licensed Athletic Trainer
35 licensure requirements throughout the States;
36 K. Affirm the authority of all Member States to hold a
37 Licensed Athletic Trainer accountable for abiding by the
38 Scope of Practice in the State in which the patient is
39 located at the time of care; and
40 L. Require adherence to the Model Compact Language in
41 order to promote uniformity and ensure that all Member
42 States have accepted and are mutually obligated to the same
43 terms.
44 SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
45 As used in this compact, unless the context requires
46 otherwise, the following definitions shall apply:
47 A. "Active Military Member" means any individual with
48 full-time duty status in the active armed forces of the

SB 1149 3
49 United States, including members of the National Guard and
50 Reserve.
51 B. "Adverse Action" means any administrative, civil,
52 equitable or criminal action permitted by a State's laws
53 which is imposed by a Licensing Authority or other authority
54 against a Licensee, including actions against an
55 individual's License or Compact Privilege such as
56 revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the
57 Licensee, limitation on the Licensee's practice, or any
58 other Encumbrance on licensure affecting a Licensee's
59 authorization to practice.
60 C. "Alternative Program" means a non-disciplinary
61 monitoring or practice remediation process applicable to an
62 Athletic Trainer approved by a State Licensing Authority of
63 a Member State in which the Athletic Trainer is licensed.
64 This includes, but is not limited to, programs to which
65 Licensees with substance use, addiction, or mental health
66 conditions are referred in lieu of Adverse Action.
67 D. "Athletic Training" means the prevention,
68 examination, assessment, treatment and rehabilitation of
69 emergent, acute, or chronic injuries and medical conditions
70 as defined by applicable Member State laws and regulations.
71 E. "Athletic Trainer Compact Commission" or "Compact
72 Commission" means the government agency whose membership
73 consists of all States that have enacted this compact, as
74 described herein and which shall operate as an
75 instrumentality of the Member States to administer and
76 implement the compact according to its terms.
77 F. "BOC" means the Board of Certification, Inc. or any
78 successor organization thereto.

SB 1149 4
79 G. "CAATE" means the Commission on Accreditation of
80 Athletic Training Education or any successor organization
81 thereto.
82 H. "Charter Member State" means any Member State which
83 enacted and made effective this compact by law before the
84 compact effective date specified herein.
85 I. "Commissioner" means the individual appointed by a
86 Member State to serve as the member of the Commission for
87 that Member State.
88 J. "Compact Privilege" means the legal authorization
89 granted by a Remote State, equivalent to a License, allowing
90 a Licensee from another Member State to provide Athletic
91 Training services in a Remote State.
92 K. "Compact Qualifying License" means a License that
93 is not an Encumbered License issued by a Member State to
94 practice Athletic Training which qualifies the Licensee to
95 exercise a Compact Privilege pursuant to Section 4 of this
96 compact.
97 L. "Continuing Competence" means a requirement, as a
98 condition of License renewal, to provide evidence of
99 successful participation, and completion of, educational and
100 professional activities relevant to practice or area of
101 work. For purposes of this compact, evidence of active BOC
102 certification may satisfy the meaning of Continuing
103 Competence as set forth herein.
104 M. "Current Significant Investigative Information"
105 means the existence of:
106 1. Investigative Information that a Licensing
107 Authority, after a preliminary inquiry that includes
108 notification and an opportunity for the subject Licensee to
109 respond, if required by State law, has reason to believe is

SB 1149 5
110 not groundless and, if proven true, would indicate more than
111 a minor infraction; or
112 2. Investigative Information that indicates that the
113 subject Licensee represents an immediate threat to public
114 health and safety regardless of whether the subject Licensee
115 has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.
116 N. "Criminal Background Check" means the submission of
117 fingerprints or other biometric-based information for a
118 License applicant for the purpose of obtaining that
119 applicant's criminal history record information, as defined
120 in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d) from the Federal Bureau of
121 Investigation and the State's criminal history record
122 repository as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(f).
123 O. "Data System" means the Commission's repository of
124 information about Licensees, including but not limited to
125 examination, licensure, investigative, Compact Privilege,
126 Adverse Action, and Alternative Program.
127 P. "Encumbrance" or "Encumbered" means a revocation or
128 suspension of, or any limitation or condition on, the full
129 and unrestricted practice of Athletic Training.
130 Q. "Executive Committee" means a group of
131 commissioners elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and
132 within the powers granted to them by, the compact and
133 Commission.
134 R. "Investigative Information" means information,
135 records, and documents received or generated by a Licensing
136 Authority pursuant to an investigation.
137 S. "Jurisprudence Requirement" means the assessment of
138 an individual's knowledge of the laws and Rules governing
139 the practice of Athletic Training, as applicable, in a State.
140 T. "License" means current authorization by a Member
141 State to engage in the practice of Athletic Training.

SB 1149 6
142 U. "Licensee" or "Licensed Athletic Trainer" means an
143 individual who currently holds an active, unrestricted
144 License and who meets all of the requirements outlined in
145 Section 4 of this compact.
146 V. "Licensing Authority" means the board or agency of
147 a State, or equivalent, that is responsible for the
148 licensing and regulation of Athletic Trainers.
149 W. "Model Compact Language" means the model language
150 for the Athletic Trainer Compact on file with The Council of
151 State Governments or other entity as designated by the
152 Commission to which all Member States must substantively
153 adhere and adopt.
154 X. "Member State" means a State that has enacted the
155 compact.
156 Y. "Remote State" means a Member State other than the
157 State of Qualifying Licensure.
158 Z. "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by an
159 authorized entity that has the force of law.
160 AA. "Scope of Practice" means the procedures, actions,
161 and processes an Athletic Trainer licensed in a State is
162 permitted to undertake in that State and the circumstances
163 under which the Licensee is permitted to undertake those
164 procedures, actions and processes. Such procedures, actions
165 and processes and the circumstances under which they may be
166 undertaken may be established through means, including, but
167 not limited to, statute, regulations, case law, and other
168 processes available to the State Licensing Authority or
169 other government agency. Scope of Practice shall include
170 any State requirements regarding supervision or direction,
171 if required by such State and as further defined by such
172 State's statutes and regulations.

SB 1149 7
173 BB. "Single State License" means a License issued by
174 any State that authorizes practice only within the issuing
175 State.
176 CC. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district,
177 or territory of the United States of America.
178 DD. "State of Qualifying Licensure" means the Member
179 State who has issued a Compact Qualifying License to a
180 Licensee pursuant to this compact.
181 EE. "Unencumbered License" means a License that
182 authorizes a Licensee to engage in the full and unrestricted
183 practice of Athletic Training.
184 SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
185 A. To be eligible to join this compact and to maintain
186 eligibility as a Member State, a State must:
187 1. Enact and maintain a statute that is not materially
188 different from the Model Compact Language;
189 2. License and regulate the practice of Athletic
190 Training;
191 3. Require that Licensees in that State maintain
192 Continuing Competence standards as part of their State
193 practice act or Rules;
194 4. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and
195 investigating complaints about Licensees;
196 5. Grant the Compact Privilege to a Licensee who meets
197 all the requirements outlined in Section 4 in accordance
198 with the terms of the compact and any Rules promulgated
199 thereunder;
200 6. Participate fully in the Compact Commission's Data
201 System, including using the unique identifier as defined in
202 Rules;
203 7. Notify the Compact Commission, in compliance with
204 the terms of the Compact and Rules, of any Adverse Action or

SB 1149 8
205 the availability of Current Significant Investigative
206 Information regarding a Licensee;
207 8. Within a time frame established by Rule, implement
208 or utilize procedures for considering the criminal history
209 records of applicants for a Compact Qualifying License which
210 includes receiving the results of the Federal Bureau of
211 Investigation record search and shall use those results in
212 making licensure decisions. These procedures shall include
213 the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based
214 information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an
215 applicant's criminal history record information from the
216 Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible
217 for retaining that State's criminal records; and
218 a. A Member State must fully implement a Criminal
219 Background Check requirement in order to participate in the
220 issuance and acceptance of Compact Privileges.
221 b. Communication between a Member State and the
222 Compact Commission or among Member States regarding the
223 verification of eligibility for licensure through the
224 compact shall not include any information received from the
225 Federal Bureau of Investigation relating to a federal
226 criminal records check performed by a Member State.
227 9. Comply with and enforce the Rules of the Compact
228 Commission.
229 B. Member States may set and collect a fee for
230 issuance and renewal of a Compact Privilege to applicants.
231 C. Individuals without a Compact Qualifying License
232 shall continue to be able to apply for a Member State's
233 Single-State License as provided under the laws of each
234 Member State.

SB 1149 9
235 D. Nothing in this compact shall affect the
236 requirements established by a Member State for the issuance
237 of a Single State License.
238 E. A Compact Qualifying License shall be recognized by
239 each Remote State as authorizing that Licensee to engage in
240 the practice of Athletic Training, under a Compact
241 Privilege, in another Member State in accordance with the
242 requirements in Section 4.
243 SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
244 A. To be eligible for a Compact Privilege under the
245 terms and provisions of the compact, the Licensee shall
246 complete a Criminal Background Check performed by the
247 Licensing Authority in the State of Qualifying Licensure
248 prior to entry in the compact and shall:
249 1. Satisfy one of the following two pathways:
250 a. Hold a valid current active certification through
251 the BOC, or its successor organization; or
252 b. If a Licensee does not meet the requirements of
253 4.A.1.a., the following must be completed:
254 i. An education program which is either:
255 1. At least a bachelor's degree with a major course of
256 study in Athletic Training, or an equivalent course of study
257 from a college or university accredited at the time of
258 graduation by CAATE, or its successor organization;
259 2. An academic degree from a college or university in
260 a foreign country equivalent to the degree described in
261 subparagraph 1 of this subsection with a major course of
262 study as described in subparagraph 1 of this subsection that
263 is accredited by CAATE, or its successor organization; or
264 3. The substantial equivalent of the foregoing which
265 the Commission may determine by Rule.

SB 1149 10
266 ii. Successful completion of the exam administered by
267 the BOC, or its successor organization, preceding the date
268 of the Licensee's application for Licensure in their State
269 of Qualifying Licensure or the substantial equivalent of the
270 foregoing requirement which the Commission may determine by
271 Rule.
272 2. Hold a Compact Qualifying License;
273 3. Have not had any Encumbrance against any license or
274 Compact Privilege to practice Athletic Training within the
275 previous two (2) years;
276 4. Be eligible for a Compact Privilege in any Member
277 State in accordance with Section 4;
278 5. Notify the Compact Commission that the Licensee is
279 seeking the Compact Privilege within a Remote State(s);
280 6. Pay any applicable fees, including any State fee,
281 for the Compact Privilege;
282 7. Meet only the Continuing Competence requirements
283 established by the State of Qualifying Licensure;
284 8. Comply with any requirements of the State of
285 Qualifying Licensure as set forth in Section 3;
286 9. Meet any Jurisprudence Requirements established by
287 the Remote State(s) in which the Licensee is seeking a
288 Compact Privilege; and
289 10. Report to the Compact Commission any Adverse
290 Action, Encumbrance, or restriction on a license taken by
291 any non-Member State within 30 days from the date the action
292 is taken.
293 B. The Compact Privilege is valid until the expiration
294 date of the Compact Qualifying License. To maintain a
295 Compact Privilege, renewal of the Compact Privilege shall be
296 congruent with the renewal of the Compact Qualifying License
297 as the Compact Commission may define by Rule. The Licensee

SB 1149 11
298 must comply with the requirements of this section to
299 maintain the Compact Privilege in the Remote State. A
300 Licensee may apply for and hold Compact Privileges in
301 multiple Member States.
302 C. A Licensed Athletic Trainer must follow the Scope
303 of Practice of the Member State where the patient is
304 located. A Licensee engaging in the practice of Athletic
305 Training in a Remote State under the Compact Privilege shall
306 adhere to the Scope of Practice laws and regulations of the
307 Remote State. Licensees shall be responsible for educating
308 themselves on, and complying with, any and all Scope of
309 Practice laws and regulations State laws relating to the
310 remote practice of Athletic Training, as applicable.
311 D. A Licensee engaging in the practice of Athletic
312 Training in a Remote State is subject to that State's
313 regulatory authority. A Remote State may, in accordance
314 with due process and that State's laws, remove a Licensee's
315 Compact Privilege in the Remote State for a specific period
316 of time, impose fines, or take any other necessary actions
317 to protect the health and safety of its citizens. Any
318 Member State which undertakes such an action shall promptly
319 notify the Member State and the Commission as specified in
320 the Rules. The Licensee may be deemed to be ineligible to
321 exercise the Compact Privilege by any Member State until the
322 specific time for removal has passed and all fines are paid.
323 E. All Member State disciplinary orders that impose
324 Adverse Action against a Compact Qualifying License shall
325 result in deactivation of the Licensee's Compact Privilege
326 in all Member States during the pendency of the order. If a
327 Compact Qualifying License is Encumbered, the Licensee shall
328 lose the Compact Privilege in any Remote State until the
329 following occur:

SB 1149 12
330 1. The Compact Qualifying License is no longer
331 Encumbered; and
332 2. The Licensee has not had any Encumbrance or
333 restriction against any License, Compact Qualifying License
334 or Compact Privilege within the previous two (2) years.
335 F. Once an Encumbered License is restored to good
336 standing as a Compact Qualifying License (as certified by
337 the Licensing Authority), the Licensee must meet the
338 requirements of this section to obtain a Compact Privilege
339 in any Remote State.
340 G. If a Licensee's Compact Privilege in any Remote
341 State is removed, that Licensee may also lose the Compact
342 Privilege in other Remote States, as each Member State shall
343 determine in its sole authority, until the following occur:
344 1. The specific period of time for which the Compact
345 Privilege was removed has ended;
346 2. All fines have been paid; and
347 3. Have not had any Encumbrance or restriction against
348 any License or Compact Privilege within the previous two (2)
349 years.
350 H. Once the requirements of Section 4.G have been met,
351 the Licensee must meet the requirements in Section 4.A to
352 obtain a Compact Privilege in a Remote State.
353 SECTION 5. COMPACT QUALIFYING LICENSE
354 A. A Licensee may only designate one License as their
355 Compact Qualifying License at a time. The procedures for
356 such designation may be further defined by Compact
357 Commission Rule.
358 B. Nothing in this Section shall require that the
359 State of Qualifying Licensure be the State of primary
360 residence or State of primary practice for the Licensee.

SB 1149 13
361 C. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a
362 Licensee's ability to hold a Single State License in
363 multiple States.
364 D. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the
365 requirements established by a Member State for the issuance
366 of a Single State License.
367 SECTION 6. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER OR THEIR SPOUSES
368 An Active Military Member or their spouse shall not be
369 required to pay a fee to the Commission for a Compact
370 Privilege. If a Member State chooses to charge a Member
371 State fee, it may choose to charge a reduced fee or no fee
372 to an Active Military Member or their spouse for a Compact
373 Privilege.
374 SECTION 7. ADVERSE ACTIONS
375 A. A Member State in which a Licensee is issued a
376 Compact Qualifying License shall have the exclusive
377 authority to impose Adverse Action against the Compact
378 Qualifying License issued by that Member State.
379 B. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on
380 Current Significant Investigative Information of a Remote
381 State, so long as the Member State follows its own
382 procedures for imposing Adverse Action.
383 C. Nothing in this compact shall override a Member
384 State's decision that participation in an Alternative
385 Program may be used in lieu of Adverse Action and that such
386 participation shall remain non-public if required by the
387 Member State's laws or Rules.
388 D. A Remote State shall have the authority to:
389 1. Take Adverse Actions as set forth herein against a
390 Licensee's Compact Privilege in that State; and

SB 1149 14
391 2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and
392 investigations that require the attendance and testimony of
393 witnesses as well as the production of evidence.
394 a. Subpoenas may be issued by a Member State Athletic
395 Training Licensing Authority for the attendance and
396 testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence.
397 b. A Member State which issues a subpoena may request
398 service of that subpoena by another Member State. The
399 Member State receiving the request to serve a subpoena shall
400 serve the subpoena if it is deemed enforceable by a court of
401 competent jurisdiction according to the practice and
402 procedure in the receiving Member State.
403 c. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees,
404 travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the
405 service statutes of the State where the witnesses or
406 evidence are located.
407 E. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, a Member
408 State shall give the same priority and effect to reported
409 conduct received from another Member State as it would if
410 the conduct had occurred within that State. In so doing,
411 the investigating Member State shall apply its own State
412 laws to determine appropriate action.
413 F. A Member State, if otherwise permitted by State
414 law, may recover from the affected Licensee the costs of
415 investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any
416 Adverse Action taken against that Licensee.
417 G. Joint Investigations:
418 1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member
419 State by its respective State law, any Member State may
420 participate with other Member States in joint investigations
421 of Licensees.

SB 1149 15
422 2. Member States shall share any Current Significant
423 Investigative Information, litigation, or compliance
424 materials in furtherance of any joint or individual
425 investigation initiated under the compact. In sharing such
426 information between Member State Athletic Trainer Licensing
427 Authorities, all information obtained shall be kept
428 confidential, except as otherwise mutually agreed upon by
429 the sharing and receiving Member State(s).
430 3. A Remote State may issue subpoenas on behalf of a
431 Member State for both hearings and investigations that
432 require the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as
433 the production of evidence.
434 H. If a Member State takes Adverse Action, it shall
435 promptly notify the administrator of the Data System. The
436 administrator of the Data System shall promptly notify all
437 Member States of any Adverse Actions by Remote States.
438 I. Nothing in this compact may permit a Member State
439 to take any Adverse Action against a Licensee or holder of a
440 Compact Privilege for conduct or practice occurring in
441 another Member State that was legal in the Member State at
442 the time it was undertaken.
443 SECTION 8. ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF THE COMMISSION
444 A. The compact Member States hereby create and
445 establish a joint government agency whose membership
446 consists of all Member States that have enacted the compact
447 known as the Athletic Trainer Licensure Compact Commission.
448 The Compact Commission is an instrumentality of the Member
449 States acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one
450 State. The Compact Commission shall come into existence on
451 or after the effective date of the Compact as set forth in
452 Section 12.
453 B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings:

SB 1149 16
454 1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one
455 (1) Commissioner selected by that Member State's Licensing
456 Authority within 60 days of the Member State's effective
457 date.
458 2. The Commissioner shall be an administrator or their
459 designated staff or current board member of the Licensing
460 Authority.
461 3. The Compact Commission may recommend removal or
462 suspension of any Commissioner from office.
463 4. A Member State's Licensing Authority shall fill any
464 vacancy of its Commissioner occurring on the Compact
465 Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.
466 5. Each Commissioner shall be entitled to one vote on
467 all matters before the Compact Commission requiring a vote
468 by the Commissioners.
469 6. The Compact Commission shall meet at least once
470 during each calendar year. Additional meetings may be held
471 as set forth in the Commission bylaws. A Commissioner shall
472 vote in person or by such other means as provided in the
473 bylaws. The bylaws may provide for Commissioners to meet by
474 telecommunication, videoconference, or other means of
475 communication.
476 C. The Compact Commission shall have the following
477 powers:
478 1. Promulgate, adopt, and amend Rules and bylaws;
479 2. Establish code of conduct, confidentiality, and
480 conflict of interest policies for Commissioners;
481 3. Establish the fiscal year of the Compact Commission;
482 4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with
483 the bylaws;
484 5. Purchase and maintain insurance and insurance bonds;

SB 1149 17
485 6. Accept, or contract for services of personnel,
486 including, but not limited to, employees of a Member State;
487 7. Conduct a financial review or audit;
488 8. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
489 compensation, define duties, grant such individuals
490 appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the
491 Compact, and establish the Compact Commission's personnel
492 policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest,
493 qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel
494 matters;
495 9. Enter into contracts or arrangements for the
496 management of the affairs of the Commission;
497 10. Assess and collect fees;
498 11. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations,
499 grants of money, other sources of revenue, equipment,
500 supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and
501 dispose of the same; provided that at all times the Compact
502 Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or
503 conflict of interest;
504 12. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve,
505 invest, or use any property, real, personal, or mixed, or
506 any undivided interest therein;
507 13. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
508 abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real,
509 personal, or mixed;
510 14. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
511 15. Borrow and invest money;
512 16. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with
513 the provisions of this compact, the Compact Commission's
514 Rules, and the bylaws;
515 17. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions
516 in the name of the Compact Commission, provided that the

SB 1149 18
517 standing of any Licensing Authority to sue or be sued under
518 applicable law shall not be affected;
519 18. Maintain and certify records and information
520 provided to a Member State as the authenticated business
521 records of the Compact Commission, and designate an agent to
522 do so on the Compact Commission's behalf;
523 19. Provide and receive information from, and
524 cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;
525 20. Determine whether a State's adopted language is
526 materially different from the Model Compact Language such
527 that the State would not qualify for participation in the
528 compact;
529 21. Establish and elect an Executive Committee,
530 including a chair and a vice chair, secretary, treasurer,
531 and such other offices as the Commission shall establish by
532 Rule or bylaw;
533 22. Appoint committees, including standing committees,
534 composed of Member State Commissioners, State regulators,
535 State legislators or their representatives, and consumer
536 representatives, and such other interested persons as may be
537 designated in this compact and the bylaws; and
538 23. Perform such other functions as may be necessary
539 or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact.
540 D. The Executive Committee:
541 1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act
542 on behalf of the Compact Commission according to the terms
543 of this compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities
544 of the Executive Committee shall include:
545 a. Exercise the powers and duties of the Compact
546 Commission during the interim between Compact Commission
547 meetings, except for adopting or amending Rules, adopting or
548 amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties

SB 1149 19
549 expressly reserved to the Compact Commission by Rule or
550 bylaw;
551 b. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the
552 administration of the Compact including enforcement and
553 compliance with the provisions of the Compact, its Rules and
554 bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
555 c. Recommend to the Compact Commission changes to the
556 Rules or bylaws, changes to this compact legislation, fees
557 charged to Compact Member States, fees charged to Licensees,
558 and other fees;
559 d. Ensure compact administration services are
560 appropriately provided, including by contract;
561 e. Prepare and recommend the budget;
562 f. Maintain financial records on behalf of the Compact
563 Commission;
564 g. Monitor compact compliance of Member States and
565 provide compliance reports to the Compact Commission;
566 h. Establish additional committees as necessary; and
567 i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of
568 the Compact Commission.
569 2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of five
570 voting members, elected by the Compact Commission:
571 a. The chair and vice chair of the Compact Commission,
572 shall be voting members of the Executive Committee;
573 b. The Compact Commission shall elect up to three
574 additional voting members from the current membership of the
575 Compact Commission to include the offices of treasurer,
576 secretary, and one member-at-large; and
577 c. Up to four (4) ex-officio, nonvoting members from
578 recognized national athletic trainer organizations.

SB 1149 20
579 3. The Compact Commission may remove any member of the
580 Executive Committee as provided in the Compact Commission's
581 bylaws.
582 4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least
583 annually:
584 a. Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the
585 public, except that the Executive Committee may meet in a
586 closed, non-public meeting as provided in this section.
587 b. The Executive Committee shall give advance notice
588 of its meetings, posted on its website and as determined by
589 rule or bylaw to provide notice to persons with an interest
590 in the business of the Compact Commission.
591 c. The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting
592 in accordance with this section.
593 E. The Compact Commission shall adopt and provide to
594 the Member States an annual report.
595 F. Meetings of the Compact Commission:
596 1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except
597 that the Compact Commission may meet in a closed, non-public
598 meeting as provided in this section.
599 2. Public notice for all meetings of the full Compact
600 Commission of meetings shall be given in the same manner as
601 required under the rulemaking provisions in this compact,
602 except that the Compact Commission may hold a special
603 meeting as provided in this section.
604 3. The Compact Commission may hold a special meeting
605 when it must meet to conduct emergency business by giving 24
606 hours' notice to all Commissioners, on the Compact
607 Commission's website, and other means as provided in the
608 Compact Commission's Rules. The Compact Commission's legal
609 counsel shall certify that the Compact Commission's need to
610 meet qualifies as an emergency.

SB 1149 21
611 4. The Compact Commission or the Executive Committee
612 or other committees of the Compact Commission may convene in
613 a closed, non-public meeting for the Compact Commission or
614 Executive Committee or other committees of the Compact
615 Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
616 a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its
617 obligations under the Compact;
618 b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
619 matters, practices or procedures related to specific
620 employees;
621 c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by a
622 Member State's Licensing Authority;
623 d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
624 litigation;
625 e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease,
626 or sale of goods, services, or real estate;
627 f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally
628 censuring any person;
629 g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial
630 information that is privileged or confidential;
631 h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure
632 would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal
633 privacy;
634 i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement
635 purposes;
636 j. Information related to any investigative reports
637 prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Compact
638 Commission or other committee charged with responsibility of
639 investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant
640 to the compact;
641 k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
642 federal or Member State law; or

SB 1149 22
643 l. Other matters as specified in Rules of the Compact
644 Commission.
645 5. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed,
646 the Compact Commission's legal counsel or designee shall
647 certify that the meeting will be closed and reference each
648 relevant exempting provision, and such reference shall be
649 recorded in the minutes. All minutes and documents of a
650 closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release
651 only by a majority vote of the Compact Commission or order
652 of a court of competent jurisdiction.
653 G. Financing of the Compact Commission:
654 1. The Compact Commission shall pay, or provide for
655 the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its
656 establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
657 2. The Compact Commission may accept any and all
658 appropriate revenue sources as provided in this section.
659 3. The Compact Commission may levy on and collect an
660 annual assessment from each Member State and impose fees on
661 Licensees of Member States to whom it grants a Compact
662 Privilege to cover the cost of the operations and activities
663 of the Compact Commission and its staff, which must be in a
664 total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as
665 approved each year for which revenue is not provided by
666 other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for
667 Member States shall be allocated based upon a formula that
668 the Compact Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
669 4. The Compact Commission shall not incur obligations
670 of any kind prior to securing the funds or a loan adequate
671 to meet the same; nor shall the Compact Commission pledge
672 the credit of any of the Member States, except by and with
673 the authority of the Member State.

SB 1149 23
674 5. The Compact Commission shall keep accurate accounts
675 of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and
676 disbursements of the Compact Commission shall be subject to
677 the financial review or audit and accounting procedures
678 established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and
679 disbursements of funds handled by the Compact Commission
680 shall be subject to an annual financial review or audit by a
681 certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of
682 the financial review or audit shall be included in and
683 become part of the annual report of the Compact Commission.
684 H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification:
685 1. The members, officers, executive director,
686 employees and representatives of the Compact Commission
687 shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and
688 in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or
689 loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability
690 caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act,
691 error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against
692 whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing
693 occurred within the scope of Compact Commission employment,
694 duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this
695 paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from
696 suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability
697 caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of
698 that person. The procurement of insurance of any type by
699 the Compact Commission shall not in any way compromise or
700 limit the immunity granted hereunder.
701 2. The Compact Commission shall defend any member,
702 officer, executive director, employee, and representative of
703 the Compact Commission in any civil action seeking to impose
704 liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
705 or omission that occurred within the scope of Compact

SB 1149 24
706 Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as
707 determined by the Compact Commission that the person against
708 whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing
709 occurred within the scope of Compact Commission employment,
710 duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein
711 shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining
712 their own counsel at their own expense; and provided
713 further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission
714 did not result from that person's intentional or willful or
715 wanton misconduct.
716 3. The Compact Commission shall indemnify and hold
717 harmless any member, officer, executive director, employee,
718 and representative of the Compact Commission for the amount
719 of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person
720 arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission
721 that occurred within the scope of Compact Commission
722 employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person
723 had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
724 scope of Compact Commission employment, duties, or
725 responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act,
726 error, or omission did not result from the intentional or
727 willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
728 4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation
729 on the liability of any Licensee for professional
730 malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by
731 any other applicable State laws.
732 5. Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to
733 waive or otherwise abrogate a Member State's state action
734 immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect to
735 antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any
736 other State or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or
737 regulation.

SB 1149 25
738 6. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a
739 waiver of sovereign immunity by the Member States or by the
740 Compact Commission.
741 SECTION 9. DATA SYSTEM
742 A. The Commission shall provide for the development,
743 maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated
744 Data System and reporting system containing licensure,
745 Compact Privileges, Adverse Action, and the presence of
746 Current Significant Investigative Information on all
747 Licensees and applicants for a License in Member States.
748 B. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to
749 the contrary, a Member State shall submit a uniform data set
750 to the Data System on all Licensees, applicants, and others
751 to whom this compact is applicable as required by the Rules
752 of the Compact Commission, including:
753 1. Personally identifying information;
754 2. Licensure data;
755 3. Adverse Actions against a Licensee, License
756 applicant or Compact Privilege and information related
757 thereto;
758 4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative
759 Program participation, the beginning and ending dates of
760 such participation, and other information related to such
761 participation;
762 5. Any denial of an application for licensure and the
763 reason(s) for such denial (excluding the reporting of any
764 criminal history record information where prohibited by law);
765 6. A binary determination regarding the presence of
766 Current Significant Investigative Information; and
767 7. Other information that may facilitate the
768 administration of this compact or the protection of the
769 public, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.

SB 1149 26
770 C. The records and information provided to a Member
771 State pursuant to this compact or through the Data System,
772 when certified by the Commission or an agent thereof, shall
773 constitute the authenticated business records of the
774 Commission, and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay
775 exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial or
776 administrative proceedings in a Member State.
777 D. Current Significant Investigative Information
778 pertaining to a Licensee in any Member State will only be
779 available to other Member States.
780 E. It is the responsibility of the Member States to
781 monitor the Data System to determine whether Adverse Action
782 has been taken against a Licensee or License applicant.
783 Adverse Action information pertaining to a Licensee or
784 License applicant in any Member State will be available to
785 any other Member State.
786 F. Member States contributing information to the Data
787 System may designate information that may not be shared with
788 the public without the express permission of the
789 contributing State.
790 G. Any information submitted to the Data System that
791 is subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws
792 of the Member State contributing the information shall be
793 removed from the Data System.
794 SECTION 10. RULEMAKING
795 A. The Compact Commission shall promulgate reasonable
796 Rules in order to effectively and efficiently implement and
797 administer the purposes and provisions of the Compact. A
798 Rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a
799 court of competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is
800 invalid because the Compact Commission exercised its
801 rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope

SB 1149 27
802 and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted
803 hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of
804 review.
805 B. The Rules of the Compact Commission shall have the
806 force of law in each Member State, provided however that
807 where the Rules conflict with the laws or regulations of a
808 Member State that relate to the Scope of Practice a Licensed
809 Athletic Trainer is permitted to undertake in that State and
810 the circumstances under which they may do so, as held by a
811 court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Compact
812 Commission shall be ineffective in that State to the extent
813 of the conflict.
814 C. The Compact Commission shall exercise its
815 rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this
816 section and the Rules adopted thereunder. Rules of this
817 compact shall become binding on the day following adoption
818 or as of the date specified in the Rule or amendment,
819 whichever is later.
820 D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member
821 States rejects a Rule or portion of a Rule, by enactment of
822 a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the
823 Compact within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the
824 Rule, then such Rule shall have no further force and effect
825 in any Member State.
826 E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special
827 meeting of the Compact Commission.
828 F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Compact
829 Commission shall hold a public hearing and allow persons to
830 provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions,
831 and arguments. At least thirty (30) days in advance of the
832 public hearing on the proposed Rule, the Compact Commission
833 shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking:

SB 1149 28
834 1. On the website of the Compact Commission or other
835 publicly accessible platform;
836 2. To persons who have requested notice of the Compact
837 Commission's notices of proposed rulemaking; and
838 3. In such other way(s) as the Compact Commission may
839 by Rule specify.
840 G. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
841 1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing
842 at which the Compact Commission will hear public comments on
843 the proposed Rule and, if different, the time, date, and
844 location of the meeting where the Compact Commission will
845 consider and vote on the proposed Rule;
846 2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video
847 conference, or other electronic means, the Compact
848 Commission shall include the mechanism for access to the
849 hearing in the notice of proposed rulemaking;
850 3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason
851 therefor;
852 4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from
853 any interested person; and
854 5. The manner in which interested persons may submit
855 written comments.
856 H. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the
857 recording and all written comments and documents received by
858 the Compact Commission in response to the proposed Rule
859 shall be available to the public.
860 I. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
861 requiring a separate hearing on each Rule. Rules may be
862 grouped for the convenience of the Compact Commission at
863 hearings required by this section.

SB 1149 29
864 J. The Compact Commission shall, by majority vote of
865 all members, take final action on the proposed Rule based on
866 the rulemaking record and the full text of the Rule.
867 1. The Compact Commission may adopt changes to the
868 proposed Rule provided the changes do not enlarge the
869 original purpose of the proposed Rule.
870 2. The Compact Commission shall provide an explanation
871 of the reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed
872 Rule as well as reasons for substantive changes not made
873 that were recommended by commenters.
874 3. The Compact Commission shall determine a reasonable
875 effective date for the Rule. Except for an emergency as
876 provided in this section, the effective date of the Rule
877 shall be no sooner than 30 days after issuing the notice
878 that it adopted or amended the Rule.
879 K. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
880 Compact Commission may consider and adopt an emergency Rule
881 with 24 hours' notice, with opportunity to comment, provided
882 that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the compact
883 and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the
884 Rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than
885 ninety (90) days after the effective date of the Rule. For
886 the purposes of this provision, an emergency Rule is one
887 that must be adopted immediately in order to:
888 1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety,
889 or welfare;
890 2. Prevent a loss of Compact Commission or Member
891 State funds;
892 3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that
893 is established by federal law or rule; or
894 4. Protect public health and safety.

SB 1149 30
895 L. The Compact Commission or an authorized committee
896 of the Compact Commission may direct revisions to a
897 previously adopted Rule for purposes of correcting
898 typographical errors, errors in format, errors in
899 consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any
900 revisions shall be posted on the website of the Compact
901 Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by
902 any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting.
903 The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the
904 revision results in a material change to a Rule. A
905 challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the
906 Compact Commission prior to the end of the notice period.
907 If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect
908 without further action. If the revision is challenged, the
909 revision may not take effect without the approval of the
910 Compact Commission.
911 M. No Member State's rulemaking requirements shall
912 apply under this Compact.
913 SECTION 11. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
914 A. Oversight:
915 1. The executive and judicial branches of State
916 government in each Member State shall enforce this compact
917 and take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement
918 the compact.
919 2. Except as otherwise provided in this compact, venue
920 is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Compact
921 Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a
922 court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office
923 of the Compact Commission is located. The Compact
924 Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to
925 the extent it adopts or consents to participate in
926 alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein

SB 1149 31
927 shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in
928 any action against a Licensee for professional malpractice,
929 misconduct or any such similar matter.
930 3. The Compact Commission shall be entitled to receive
931 service of process in any proceeding regarding the
932 enforcement or interpretation of the compact and shall have
933 standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all
934 purposes. Failure to provide the Compact Commission service
935 of process shall render a judgment or order void as to the
936 Compact Commission, this Compact, or promulgated Rules.
937 B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination:
938 1. If the Compact Commission determines that a Member
939 State has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or
940 responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated
941 Rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to the
942 defaulting State. The notice of default shall describe the
943 default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any
944 other action that the Compact Commission may take, and shall
945 offer training and specific technical assistance regarding
946 the default.
947 2. The Compact Commission shall provide a copy of the
948 notice of default to the other Member States.
949 C. If a State in default fails to cure the default,
950 the defaulting State may be terminated from the compact upon
951 an affirmative vote of a majority of the Commissioners of
952 the Member States, and all rights, privileges and benefits
953 conferred on that State by this compact may be terminated on
954 the effective date of termination. A cure of the default
955 does not relieve the offending State of obligations or
956 liabilities incurred during the period of default.
957 D. Termination of membership in the compact shall be
958 imposed only after all other means of securing compliance

SB 1149 32
959 have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or
960 terminate shall be given by the Compact Commission to the
961 governor, the majority and minority leaders of the
962 defaulting State's legislature, the defaulting State's
963 Licensing Authority and each of the Member States' Licensing
964 Authority.
965 E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for
966 all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred
967 through the effective date of termination, including
968 obligations that extend beyond the effective date of
969 termination.
970 F. Upon the termination of a State's membership from
971 this compact, that State shall immediately provide notice to
972 all Licensees within that State of such termination. The
973 terminated State shall continue to recognize all Licenses
974 and Compact Privileges granted pursuant to this compact for
975 a minimum of 180 days after the date of said notice of
976 termination.
977 G. The Compact Commission shall not bear any costs
978 related to a State that is found to be in default or that
979 has been terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in
980 writing between the Compact Commission and the defaulting
981 State.
982 H. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the
983 Compact Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court
984 for the District of Columbia or the federal district where
985 the Compact Commission has its principal offices. The
986 prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
987 litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
988 I. Dispute Resolution:
989 1. Upon request by a Member State, the Compact
990 Commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the

SB 1149 33
991 compact that arise among Member States and between Member
992 and non-Member States.
993 2. The Compact Commission shall promulgate a Rule
994 providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution
995 for disputes as appropriate.
996 J. Enforcement:
997 1. By two-thirds majority (2/3) vote, the Compact
998 Commission may initiate legal action against a Member State
999 in default in the United States District Court for the
1000 District of Columbia or the federal district where the
1001 Compact Commission has its principal offices to enforce
1002 compliance with the provisions of the compact and its
1003 promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both
1004 injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
1005 enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be
1006 awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable
1007 attorney's fees. The remedies herein shall not be the
1008 exclusive remedies of the Compact Commission. The Compact
1009 Commission may pursue any other remedies available under
1010 federal or the defaulting Member State's law.
1011 2. A Member State may initiate legal action against
1012 the Compact Commission in the U.S. District Court for the
1013 District of Columbia or the federal district where the
1014 Compact Commission has its principal offices to enforce
1015 compliance with the provisions of the compact and its
1016 promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both
1017 injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
1018 enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be
1019 awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable
1020 attorney's fees.
1021 3. No person other than a Member State shall enforce
1022 this compact against the Compact Commission.

SB 1149 34
1023 SECTION 12. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
1024 A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on
1025 which the compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh
1026 Member State.
1027 1. On or after the effective date of the compact, the
1028 Compact Commission shall convene and review the enactment of
1029 each of the first seven Member States ("Charter Member
1030 States") to determine if the statute enacted and made
1031 effective by each such Charter Member State is materially
1032 different than the model compact statute.
1033 a. A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to
1034 be materially different from the Model Compact Language
1035 shall be entitled to the default process set forth in
1036 Section 11.
1037 b. If any Member State is later found to be in
1038 default, or is terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the
1039 Compact Commission shall remain in existence and the Compact
1040 shall remain in effect even if the number of Member States
1041 should be less than seven.
1042 2. Member States enacting the compact subsequent to
1043 the seven initial Charter Member States shall be subject to
1044 the process set forth in this section to determine if their
1045 enactments are materially different from the model Compact
1046 statute and whether they qualify for participation in the
1047 Compact.
1048 3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Compact
1049 Commission or in furtherance of the purposes of the
1050 administration of the compact prior to the effective date of
1051 the compact or the Compact Commission coming into existence
1052 shall be considered to be actions of the Compact Commission
1053 unless specifically repudiated by the Compact Commission.

SB 1149 35
1054 4. Any State that joins the compact subsequent to the
1055 Compact Commission's initial adoption of the Rules and
1056 bylaws shall be subject to the Rules and bylaws as they
1057 exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in that
1058 State. Any Rule that has been previously adopted by the
1059 Compact Commission shall have the full force and effect of
1060 law on the day the compact becomes law in that State.
1061 B. Any Member State may withdraw from this compact by
1062 enacting a statute repealing the same.
1063 1. A Member State's withdrawal shall not take effect
1064 until 180 days after enactment of the repealing statute.
1065 2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing
1066 requirement of the withdrawing State's Licensing Authority
1067 to comply with the investigative and Adverse Action
1068 reporting requirements of this compact prior to the
1069 effective date of withdrawal.
1070 3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from
1071 this compact, a State shall immediately provide notice of
1072 such withdrawal to all Licensees and privilege holders
1073 within that State. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory
1074 enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing State shall
1075 continue to recognize all Compact Privileges granted
1076 pursuant to this compact for a minimum of 180 days after the
1077 date of such notice of withdrawal.
1078 4. Nothing contained in this compact shall be
1079 construed to invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement
1080 or other cooperative arrangement between a Member State and
1081 a non-Member State that does not conflict with the
1082 provisions of this compact.
1083 5. This compact may be amended by the Member States.
1084 No amendment to this compact shall become effective and

SB 1149 36
1085 binding upon any Member State until it is enacted into the
1086 laws of all Member States.
1087 SECTION 13. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
1088 A. This compact and the Compact Commission's
1089 rulemaking authority shall be liberally construed so as to
1090 effectuate the purposes, and the implementation and
1091 administration of the compact. Provisions of the compact
1092 expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of Rules
1093 shall not be construed to limit the Compact Commission's
1094 rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
1095 B. The provisions of this compact shall be severable
1096 and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this
1097 compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
1098 contrary to the constitution of any Member State, a State
1099 seeking participation in the compact, or of the United
1100 States, or the applicability thereof to any government,
1101 agency, person or circumstance is held to be
1102 unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the
1103 validity of the remainder of this compact and the
1104 applicability thereof to any other government, agency,
1105 person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
1106 C. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Compact
1107 Commission may deny a State's participation in the compact
1108 or terminate a Member State's participation in the Compact
1109 if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a
1110 Member State is a material departure from the Compact.
1111 Otherwise, if this compact shall be held to be contrary to
1112 the constitution of any Member State, the Compact shall
1113 remain in full force and effect as to the remaining Member
1114 States and in full force and effect as to the Member State
1115 affected as to all severable matters.

SB 1149 37
1116 SECTION 14. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE
1117 LAWS
1118 A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the
1119 enforcement of any other law of a Member State that is not
1120 inconsistent with the compact.
1121 B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal
1122 requirements in a Member State in conflict with the compact
1123 are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
1124 C. All permissible agreements between the Compact
1125 Commission and the Member States are binding in accordance
1126 with their terms.
✓